Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202638-2002
Definitions, where found.

For the purposes of the Medicine and Surgery Practice Act and elsewhere in the Uniform Credentialing Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 38-2003 to 38-2022 and 38-2065 apply.

Laws 1969, c. 560, § 7, p. 2283;

Laws 1971, LB 150, § 4;

Laws 1989, LB 342, § 17;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 425;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 83;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,107.01;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 660;

Laws 2020, LB755, § 4;

Laws 2022, LB905, § 9;

Laws 2026, LB1212, § 2.
August 1, 2027